Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.017

Death benefit—Course of employment—Occupational disease or infection.

A one hundred fifty thousand dollar death benefit shall be paid as a sundry claim to the estate of an employee of any state agency, the common school system of the state, or institution of higher education who dies as a result of (1) injuries sustained in the course of employment; or (2) an occupational disease or infection that arises naturally and proximately out of employment covered under this chapter, and is not otherwise provided a death benefit through coverage under their enrolled retirement system under chapter 402, Laws of 2003. The determination of eligibility for the benefit shall be made consistent with Title 51 RCW by the department of labor and industries. The department of labor and industries shall notify the director of the department of enterprise services by order under RCW 51.52.050.

[ 2015 c 225 s 51; 2007 c 487 s 1; 2003 c 402 s 4.]

NOTES: